District of Columbia statutes.
1-607.51

Repealed

Residency requirement.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 751
as added July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-138, § 2(c), 45 DCR 2972
Oct. 21, 1998, Pub. L. 105-277, § 153, 112 Stat. 2681-146
Section 2(c) of D.C. Law 12-138 had added this section, effective July 24, 1998; this section was subsequently repealed by Pub. L. 105-277, § 153, effective Oct. 21, 1998.
1981 Ed., § 1-607.51.
Washington convention center authority, merit personnel system inapplicable, see § 10-1202.16.
Public service commission, office of general counsel, powers and duties, see § 34-803.
Public libraries, board of trustees, powers and duties, see § 39-105.
Public employee relations board, transfer of property, personnel and cases, see § 1-605.03.
Organization for personnel management, rules and regulations, see § 1-604.04.
Merit system, personnel system, transition, rights and benefits, see § 1-602.04.
Merit system, excepted service, transitional appointments or reassignments of nontemporary appointments, see § 1-609.07.
Merit system, equal employment opportunity, physically handicapped and developmentally disabled persons, see § 1-607.02.
Merit system, effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.
Merit system, educational service, rules and regulations, see § 1-608.01a.
Merit system, educational employees, coverage, see § 1-602.03.
Merit system, coverage, agreements to provide coverage, see § 1-602.01.
Health and hospitals public benefit corporation, personnel administration, see § 44-1102.08.
Equal opportunity employment, veterans’ preference, see § 1-607.03.
Employee deferred compensation program, office of employee appeals, review, see § 47-3601.